Utah statutes.
72-9-107.   Medical exemptions for farm vehicle operators.
Except as provided in Section 53-3-206, an operator of a farm vehicle or
combination of farm vehicles is exempt from additional requirements for
physical qualifications, medical examinations, and medical certification if
the farm vehicle or combination of farm vehicles being operated is:
(1)  under 26,001 pounds gross vehicle weight rating;
(2)  not operated as a commercial motor vehicle in accordance with Subsection
53-3-102(4)(b)(ii); and
(3)  not operated as an interstate commercial motor vehicle.
